Washington statutes.
RCW 11.90.040

Communications with out-of-state courts.

(1) A court of this state may communicate with a court in another state concerning a proceeding arising under this chapter. The court may allow the parties to participate in the communication. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, the court shall make a record of the communication. The record may be limited to the fact that the communication occurred.

(2) Courts may communicate concerning schedules, calendars, court records, and other administrative matters without making a record.

[ 2009 c 81 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 81: See note following RCW 11.90.010.